Arkansas, session 2025, HB1931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 29, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9. — Recidivism Reduction System

12-29-901. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Recidivism rates reflect not just the behavior of a person
after reentry into society, but the correctional system's response to that
person's behavior during his or her term of incarceration; and
(2) The recidivism rate for the Department of Corrections for
the 2019 cohort was forty-eight and three-tenths percent (48.3%), resulting
in anticipated costs for reincarceration of over one hundred forty million
dollars ($140,000,000) annually.
(b) The General Assembly intends for the Department of Corrections to:
(1) Harness the opportunity of incarceration by beginning
*CEB278*
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
reentry preparation for those incarcerated upon the first day of
incarceration through the development and expansion of coordinated evidence-
based programming, educational systems, and reentry services that support
intended outcomes of incarceration, avert the costs of recidivism, and
enhance public safety; and
(2) Embrace a correctional philosophy that reentry preparation
must begin on the first day of incarceration and adopt policies and rules
that result in reduction of the recidivism rate of people released from the
Division of Correction and under the supervision of the Division of Community
Correction.

12-29-902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Case plan" means an individualized plan developed by the
Department of Corrections that identifies the available programs or
meaningful activities that address the needs of an inmate and reduce an
inmate's risk of recidivism;
(2) "Program or meaningful activity" means an evidence-based activity
provided to an inmate to address factors that lead to recidivism.
(3) "Recidivism" means a criminal act that results in the rearrest,
reconviction, or return to incarceration of a person with a new sentence or
the revocation of parole or post-release supervision during a three-year-
period following the person's release from custody; and
(4) "Validated risk and needs assessment" means a standardized
evaluation process that quantifies an inmate's risk of recidivism.

12-29-903. Establishment.
(a)(1) There is established the Recidivism Reduction System within the
Department of Corrections.
(2) The system shall be established at the cabinet level rather
than within the Division of the Correction or Division of Community
Corrections to address the factors that lead to recidivism.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections shall develop and
implement the system so that the system:
(1) Includes a validated risk and needs assessment to be
administered as part of the intake process, ensuring that the results
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
distinguish the different rates of failure;
(2) Assigns an inmate to appropriate programs or meaningful
activities, through development of an individualized case plan;
(3) Provides for periodic reassessment of the recidivism risk of
each inmate using an appropriate reassessment tool;
(4) Provides evidence-based programming; and
(5) Incorporates incentives and disincentives to encourage an
inmate to participate in his or her case plan.
(c) The secretary may:
(1) Add components to the system beyond those required by this
subchapter to further enhance the system and achieve the desired correctional
outcomes; and
(2) Expand the effective programs or meaningful activities that
are offered and add any new program or meaningful activity necessary to
effectively implement this subchapter.

12-29-904. Risk and needs assessment — Case plan — Periodic
reassessment.
(a) A validated risk and needs assessment shall be conducted at the
time of intake for each inmate.
(b)(1) A case plan shall be developed for each inmate based on the
findings of the validated risk and needs assessment to assign an inmate to
appropriate programs or meaningful activities to reduce the inmate's risk of
recidivism.
(2) The case plan shall:
(A) Serve as an individual road map tailored to an
inmate’s specific risks, needs, and time to serve including assigned programs
or meaningful activities;
(B) Be developed to ensure that an inmate receives the
appropriate services for his or her needs that are delivered with the
intensity and frequency necessary to reduce the inmate's risk of recidivism;
and
(C) Be updated after a reassessment under subsection (c)
of this section to reassign the inmate to appropriate programs or meaningful
activities based on the revised determination, the specific needs of the
inmate, and the successful completion of programs or meaningful activities.
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
(3) An inmate's case plan shall be discussed with the inmate and
a written or electronic copy of the results shall be made available to the
inmate.
(c) An inmate's risk of recidivism shall be reassessed periodically
using dynamic risk factors, indicators of progress, and indicators of
regression, including without limitation newly acquired skills and changes in
attitude and behavior over time.

12-29-905. Programming.
(a)(1) The Recidivism Reduction System shall include guidance on the
kind and amount of programs or meaningful activities that should be assigned
to an inmate.
(2) The guidance shall include protocols for the Department of
Corrections to tailor placement in programs or meaningful activities to the
specific needs of each inmate to most effectively reduce his or her
individual risk of recidivism.
(b) An inmate shall be assigned to a program or meaningful activity
that corresponds with the inmate's risk of recidivism in accordance with the
inmate's needs such that the higher the inmate's risk of recidivism, the more
programs or meaningful activities the inmate will be assigned.
(c) An inmate shall participate in programs or meaningful activities
throughout the inmate's entire term of incarceration.
(d) The department shall produce, publish, and update annually a
catalog containing an inventory of programs or meaningful activities offered
at each institution including without limitation the following information
for each program or meaningful activity:
(1) The title of the program or meaningful activity;
(2) A description of the program or meaningful activity;
(3) The facility or facilities at which a program or meaningful
activity is offered;
(4) The risk and needs that the specific program or meaningful
activity addresses;
(5) The program or meaningful activity delivery method such as
in-person learning, digital or virtual learning, self-paced learning,
instructor-led learning; and
(6) If the program or meaningful activity is led by an
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
instructor or provider, the minimum qualifications and title of the
instructor or provider.
(e) The department shall provide programs or meaningful activities
that include without limitation:
(1) Academic and career technical education including functional
literacy, a general educational development program, a high school diploma
program, post-secondary education, and opportunities for inmates with
learning disabilities;
(2) Substance abuse and sex offender education and treatment;
(3) Self-improvement programs such as cognitive behavioral
therapy and cognitive restructuring and reentry preparation;
(4) Family and faith-based programs; and
(5) Skills development opportunities through work assignments.
(f) Through the system and after accounting for institutional security
and the safety of each inmate and member of staff at the facility, the
department shall group and house together inmates with a similar risk of
recidivism if practicable.

12-29-906. Incentive system.
(a)(1) The Recidivism Reduction System shall incorporate incentives
and rewards for inmates to participate and complete assigned programs or
meaningful activities.
(2) An inmate who is successfully participating in his or her
assigned program or meaningful activity and demonstrates sustained prosocial
behavior shall receive incentives which may include without limitation:
(A) Extended phone privileges;
(B) Extended time for in-person or video visitation;
(C) Increased commissary spending limits;
(D) Additional personal property;
(E) Preferential work assignments;
(F) Skilled work assignments; or
(G) Extended or additional recreation activities.
(3) Incentives under this section shall be in addition to any
other rewards, incentives, and activities for which an inmate may be
eligible.
(b)(1) The system shall incorporate disincentives for an inmate who
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
violates Department of Corrections rules or fails to meet the participation
expectations for a program or meaningful activity.
(2) An inmate who refuses to attend an assigned program or
meaningful activity included in his or her case plan after being offered the
opportunity to participate shall be ineligible for incentives.
(3) An inmate who is enrolled in a program or meaningful
activity included in his or her case plan and is subsequently removed for
failure to maintain eligibility requirements or meet participation
expectations shall be ineligible for incentives until being reenrolled in a
program or meaningful activity in accordance with his or her case plan.

12-29-907. Partnerships.
(a) The Recidivism Reduction System shall include policies for the
Department of Corrections to enter partnerships with:
(1) A nonprofit or other private organization that will deliver
programs or meaningful activities on a volunteer basis, including without
limitation faith-based, art-based, and community-based organizations;
(2) An institution of higher education that will provide
instruction on a volunteer basis or through scholarships, Pell Grants, or
other means not impacting the department's budget;
(3) Private entities that will:
(A) Deliver career technical education, vocational
training, or certifications;
(B) Provide equipment to facilitate career technical
education, vocational training, or employment opportunities for inmates; or
(C) Employ inmates or assist inmates in finding
employment; and
(4) Industry-sponsored organizations that will deliver workforce
development, apprenticeships, or training on a voluntary or no cost basis or
for a licensure fee only.
(b) The department shall coordinate with the Chief Workforce Officer
annually to ensure career technical education programs and other relevant
programs align with community workforce opportunities upon reentry.

12-29-908. Programming priority ranking.
(a) An inmate shall be ranked for priority in program or meaningful
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
activity placement through a priority ranking report developed by the
Department of Corrections.
(b) A priority ranking report shall be used for placement
consideration by prioritizing those inmates with the highest risk of
recidivism.
(c) Each inmate shall be prioritized to complete a specific program or
meaningful activity during his or her incarceration.
(d) Programming priority shall:
(1) Be based on the results of an inmate's validated risk and
needs assessment; and
(2) Take into consideration an inmate's sentence length and the
time remaining for an inmate to serve.
(e) Subject to custody classification restrictions, personnel
facilitating a program or meaningful activity shall utilize the priority
ranking report to identify and place an inmate into a program or meaningful
activity by his or her rank.

12-29-909. Inmate ineligibility.
An inmate shall not be eligible to participate in an educational
program if he or she is:
(1) Housed in maximum custody or detention, except where a
digital learning educational program is available;
(2) Sentenced to death;
(3)(A) A citizen or national of a foreign country that is
legally present in the United States and subject to a detainer or a removal
order.
(B) However, a citizen or national of a foreign country
that is legally present in the United States without a detainer or removal
order may be eligible for educational programming; or
(4) A citizen or national of a foreign country that is not
legally present in the United States.

12-29-910. Reentry preparation and services.
(a)(1) There is created the position of Deputy Director of Reentry
within the Department of Corrections.
(2) The deputy director shall:
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
(A) Identify the reentry needs of the inmate population
and develop a reentry preparation program for the department to address the
needs identified in accordance with this subchapter; and
(B) Develop and update annually a reentry handbook with
relevant transition information.
(b) The department shall designate one (1) or more reentry
coordinators at each correctional facility who is dedicated to and
experienced in reentry preparation, including without limitation employment
and housing counseling.
(c) A reentry coordinator shall develop, with the input of the inmate:
(1) A reentry plan for each inmate as described in § 12-29-112;
(2) A post-release housing plan; and
(3) A post-release employment plan.
(d) A reentry coordinator shall:
(1) Provide reentry preparation that includes without limitation
in-person or digital learning modules that contain information pertinent to
transitioning from incarceration to community and family reunification;
(2) Ensure that the inmate receives:
(A) The documentation required under § 12-29-112;
(B) Information regarding any fines, fees, or child
support for which the inmate may be responsible upon release; and
(C) A copy of the reentry handbook described in
subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section;
(3) Coordinate with the Department of Health regarding benefits
that are available to the inmate upon release;
(4) Coordinate with Division of Workforce Services and Chief
Workforce Officer to help the inmate:
(A) Develop workforce connections;
(B) Craft an effective resume;
(C) Complete job applications; and
(D) Attend job fairs;
(5) Aid in establishing a relationship between the inmate and a
medical provider and transfer medical records to the medical provider or to
the inmate directly to ensure continuity of care;
(6) Coordinate with the Department of Veterans Affairs to ensure
that an inmate who is a veteran is aware of and has access to any services
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
for which he or she is eligible upon release from incarceration; and
(7)(A) Ensure that an inmate who has been diagnosed with a
serious mental illness, substance use disorder, or significant cognitive
impairment, including without limitation an intellectual disability or
traumatic brain injury, is able to engage in the appropriate health and
behavioral health services upon release.
(B) For an inmate with a substance use disorder,
subdivision (d)(7)(A) of this section includes without limitation a referral
to a medicated-assisted-treatment center and a prescription for medication to
treat an opioid use disorder.
(e) There is established a Reentry Hotline within the Department of
Corrections that shall operate during business hours and be available to
post-release inmates for assistance with information and referral to
transition services.

12-29-911. Reporting.
The Board of Corrections shall include the following in the report
required by § 12-27-104:
(1) A summary of the Department of Corrections' activities and
accomplishments under this subchapter;
(2) A summary of the types of programs or meaningful activities
that are available to inmates in each correctional facility;
(3) A summary of the effectiveness of the programs or meaningful
activities that are available to inmates in each correctional facility;
(4) The capacity of the Arkansas Correctional School District
and each program or meaningful activity at each correctional facility,
including without limitation the enrollment and utilization, the rate of
completion, and the number of apprenticeships, diplomas, certificates, and
degrees conferred;
(5) A summary of any shortage of capacity or lack of utilization
that the department has identified;
(5) The number of volunteer partnerships the department has
entered;
(6) The number of employers that the department works with under
this subchapter;
(7) The number of inmates participating in a work release
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
program and a list of the job titles or positions held;
(8) The number of inmates participating in digital or virtual
education, programming, and literacy training and the number of hours
completed for digital or virtual education, programming, and literacy
training;
(9) A summary of a decrease in recidivism that may be attributed
to implementation of the Recidivism Reduction System or the increase in
programs or meaningful activities; and
(10) A summary of cost savings or cost avoidance that may be
attributed to the Recidivism Reduction System or the increase in programs or
meaningful activities.

12-29-912. Reclassification of correctional officer positions.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections shall reclassify up
to one hundred fifty (150) vacant correctional officer positions to create an
appropriate number of Recidivism Reentry System positions necessary to comply
with this subchapter.
(b) If after reclassification, all vacant correctional officer
positions are filled and the positions having been reclassified are
determined necessary to fulfill the department’s mission, the secretary may
seek reestablishment of the reclassified correctional officer position
through a legislative request for new funding appropriation to reestablish
some or all the reclassified positions.

12-29-913. Audit.
(a) To ensure the Department of Corrections implements and operates
the Recidivism Reduction System as required under this subchapter and any
developed rules or policies, the Department of Inspector General shall
conduct biennial audits to assess system utilization, adherence, and
outcomes.
(b) The audits under subsection (a) of this section shall be provided
to the Department of Corrections and the Charitable, Penal and Correctional
Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council and be published to the
website of the Department of Corrections.
(c) If the Department of Inspector General identifies noncompliance in
an audit under subsection (a) of this section, the Department of Corrections
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
shall provide a corrective action plan to the Department of Inspector General
with date certain remedy which shall be reinspected by the Department of
Inspector General to verify that the noncompliance has been remedied.

12-29-914. Rulemaking.
The Secretary of the Department of Corrections may promulgate rules to
implement this subchapter.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary language.
Within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act,
the Secretary of the Department of Corrections shall:
(1) Develop and implement the Recidivism Reduction System;
(2) Develop a plan for each current inmate in the custody of the
Department of Corrections to be assessed under a validated risk and needs
assessment by December 31, 2026; and
(3) Ensure that each inmate in the custody of the department is
ranked for placement in programs and meaningful activities through a priority
ranking report.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary language.
Prior to December 31, 2025, the Superintendent of the Arkansas
Correctional School District, in coordination with the Department of
Education, shall present to the Charitable, Penal and Correctional
Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council a feasibility study to
implement, at minimum, the following improvements to correctional education:
(1) Establish a year-round school calendar with at least two
hundred eight (208) days of instructional time;
(2) Establish a high school diploma program;
(3) Establish a literacy program that ensures that an inmate
testing below an eighth-grade literacy standard is enrolled in a minimum of
fifteen (15) hour per week of literacy remediation until the inmate reaches
an eighth-grade literacy standard; and
(4) Analyze the cost-effectiveness of privatization of the
general educational development program.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1931
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that a high rate of recidivism
threatens the safety of the state; that the Recidivism Reduction System is
designed to meaningfully address the current high rate of recidivism; and
that this act is immediately necessary to begin implementing the Recidivism
Reduction System and address the high rate of recidivism and the danger it
poses to the people of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Beaty Jr.




















04-07-2025 10:39:33 CEB278